Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5702.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 79d. (1) "Work zone" means a portion of a street or highway open to vehicular traffic and adjacent to a barrier, berm, lane, or shoulder of a street or highway within which construction, maintenance, public utility work, reconstruction, repair, resurfacing, or surveying, or any other road work, including, but not limited to, the removal of a hazard from the street or highway, is being conducted by 1 or more individuals and that meets any of the following: (a) Is between both of the following: (i) A sign notifying the beginning of work. (ii) An "end road work" sign or, if no sign is posted, the last temporary traffic control device before the normal flow of traffic resumes. (b) Is between a "begin work convoy" sign and an "end work convoy" sign. (c) If a moving or stationary vehicle or equipment exhibiting has its presence marked by a road triangle, flare, or cone, or if the vehicle or equipment exhibits a rotating beacon or strobe light, is used, is between both of the following points: (i) A point that is 150 feet behind the rear of the vehicle or equipment or that is the point from which the road triangle, flare, cone, beacon, or strobe light is first visible on the street or highway behind the vehicle or equipment, whichever is closer to the vehicle or equipment. (ii) A point that is 150 feet in front of the front of the vehicle or equipment or that is the point from which the road triangle, flare, cone, beacon, or strobe light is first visible on the street or highway in front of the vehicle or equipment, whichever is closer to the vehicle or equipment. (2) As used in this section, "temporary traffic control device" means a traffic control device that is installed for a limited time period during construction, maintenance, public utility work, reconstruction, repair, resurfacing, or surveying as described in subsection (1). Sec. 601b. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, a person an individual responsible for a moving violation in a work zone, at an emergency scene, or in a school zone during the period beginning 30 minutes before school in the morning and through 30 minutes after school in the afternoon, or in a school bus zone is subject to a fine that is double the fine otherwise prescribed for that moving violation. (2) A person An individual who commits a moving violation in a work zone or a school bus zone for which not fewer than 3 points are assigned under section 320a and as a result causes injury to another person individual in the work zone or school bus zone, or causes injury to a road worker who is performing road work as described in section 79d, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or both. (3) A person An individual who commits a moving violation in a work zone or school bus zone for which not fewer than 3 points are assigned under section 320a and as a result causes death to another person individual in the work zone or school bus zone, or causes death to a road worker who is performing road work as described in section 79d, is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not more than $7,500.00 or by imprisonment for not more than 15 years, or both. (4) Subsections (2) and (3) do not apply if the injury or death was caused by the negligence of the injured or deceased person individual in the work zone or school bus zone. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Emergency scene" means a traffic accident, a serious incident caused by weather conditions, or another occurrence along a highway or street for which a police officer, firefighter, or emergency medical personnel are summoned to aid an injured victim. (b) "Moving violation" means an act or omission prohibited under this act or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to this act that occurs while a person an individual is operating a motor vehicle, and for which the person individual is subject to a fine. (c) "School bus zone" means the area lying within 20 feet of a school bus that has stopped and is displaying 2 alternately flashing red lights at the same level, except as described in section 682(2). (d) "School zone" means that term as defined in section 627a. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01383'25 a) or House Bill No. 5703 (request no. H01383'25 a). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02579'25) or House Bill No. 5704 (request no. H02579'25).